Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB941.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Lactation Rooms in Courthouses Act.Section 2. Findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) The Commonwealth intends to comply with Federal and State laws, regulations and policies, including:(i) 40 U.S.C. § 3318 (relating to lactation room in public buildings), which defines a lactation room;(ii) section 4207 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. § 18001 et seq.);(iii) section 207(r) of the Fair Labor Standards Act (29 U.S.C. § 207(r)), which contains requirements for providing accommodations for nursing mothers; and1234567891011121314151617 (iv) Human Resources Policy HR-WS001, Nursing Mothers Rooms which establishes a Commonwealth-wide policy that accommodates nursing people who wish to express breast milk while at work.(2) This act expands those guidelines to courthouses in this Commonwealth.(3) Breastfeeding a baby is an important and basic act of nurturing that must be protected.(4) A space should be provided in courthouses for individuals who need to express breast milk or perform nursing for a child.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Courthouse." Any of the following:(1) Any building in which the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania, the Superior Court of Pennsylvania or Commonwealth Court may hold a session.(2) The State Judicial Center in Harrisburg.(3) A county judicial center within the meaning of 42 Pa.C.S. § 3721 (relating to county judicial center or courthouse).(4) A court and court of common pleas as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).(5) A local facility for holding sessions of Statewide courts as provided in 42 Pa.C.S. § 3704 (relating to local facilities for holding sessions of Statewide court)."Lactation room." A hygienic place, other than a bathroom, that:20250SB0941PN1081 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) is shielded from view;(2) is free from intrusion; and(3) contains a chair, a working surface and, if the public building is otherwise supplied with electricity, an electrical outlet."Parent." An individual who is able to express breast milk and is currently providing breast milk for a nursing child, regardless of whether the individual has legal custody of the child.Section 4. Lactation rooms in courthouses.(a) Requirement.--A courthouse shall have at least one lactation room with the requirements established in this act and Federal law. To maintain privacy and avoid the appearance of impropriety, the lactation room may be the same used by employees for the same purpose.(b) Notice.--Notice to the public regarding the location and access to a lactation room shall be posted in areas and by designated signage standards of the government entity that owns or leases the courthouse.(c) Mandatory specifications.--A lactation room shall comply with the following specifications:(1) Be in a location that complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.). All accessories, equipment, furniture and casework shall be provided and installed to comply with the requirements of that act, including accessibility clearances and regulations.(2) Have a minimum square footage of 80 net usable square feet.(3) Have a privacy latch or locking door hardware, or both, so that the door can be locked from the inside.20250SB0941PN1081 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Provide visual privacy to the space by modifying or covering windows, sidelights and doors.(5) Provide sound privacy to the space to minimize sound transmission into adjacent spaces, including, if possible, using sound attenuation insulation.(6) Include a chair and table, countertop or desk. The chair must be upholstered, cushioned, have armrests, a high back and be of standard seating height.(7) Provide at least one electrical duplex outlet next to where an individual may be seated.(8) Contain a waste receptacle.(9) Meet standard office-level illumination and ventilation requirements.(10) Not be a restroom, toilet stall, storage room or janitor's closet.(d) Discretionary specifications.--The following specifications may be included in a lactation room:(1) Provide a sink or be adjacent to a kitchenette, breakroom or women's restroom with a sink installed in casework to provide the space necessary to clean equipment and containers.(2) Contain a refrigerator.(3) Contain additional electrical outlets throughout the room for greater flexibility in room use and furniture placement, including GFI outlets near a sink location.(4) Contain a paper towel dispenser and soap dispenser or, if the room does not contain a sink, a wet-wipe dispenser.(5) Contain outlets for voice or data access to allow for possible multipurpose use.20250SB0941PN1081 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Contain a mirror that is, if possible, full-length.(7) Include lockers or other facilities to store personal items and equipment.(8) Contain a coat hook.(9) Contain exterior hardware that displays the word "occupied" when the door is locked.(10) Contain additional seating area for children accompanying a breastfeeding parent that may include a play table, books or toys.(11) Receive cooler air from central air conditioning or a working air conditioning unit.(e) Construction.--Nothing in this act shall be construed as establishing a right of an individual to enter a courthouse.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in six months.20250SB0941PN1081 - 5 - 123456789101112131415